Utah statutes.
76-5-410.   Child victim of sexual abuse as competent witness.

A child victim of sexual abuse under the age of 10 is a competent witness and shall be allowed to testify without prior qualification in any judicial proceeding.  The trier of fact shall determine the weight and credibility of the testimony.



Amended by Chapter 74, 1985 General Session

